Hawaii statutes.
[§641-15] Service. Service of a copy
of the notice of appeal shall be made upon the adverse party or the adverse
party's attorney of record as provided by the rules of court. [L 1892, c 95, pt
of §8; am L 1919, c 44, §7; RL 1925, §2530; RL 1935, §3557; RL 1945, §9558; RL
1955, §212-8; HRS §641-18; am L 1972, c 89, pt of §5; ren HRS §641-15; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next